Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Fund

47-11-20.
Creation and membership of board of commissioners; appointment and terms; officers and compensation; vacancies.

There is created the Board of Commissioners of the Judges of the Probate Courts Retirement Fund of Georgia. The board shall consist of seven members as follows:

The Governor or the Governor’s designee;

An appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General;

Four judges of the probate courts who are members of the fund; and

One appointee of the Governor who is a member of the fund and a retired judge of the probate court.

The members of the board provided for by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed by the Governor. The first such member shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on July 1, 1984, for initial terms as follows: one such member shall be appointed for one year; one such member shall be appointed for a term of two years; and two such members shall be appointed for terms of three years. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint successors upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of three years. All such members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Such members shall be eligible for reappointment to successive terms of office as members of the board.

The member of the board provided for by paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed by the Governor. The first such member shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on October 1, 1991, for an initial term of three years. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint successors upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of three years. Each such member shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. Each such member shall be eligible for reappointment to successive terms of office as a member of the board.

The board shall elect a chairman from among its own membership to serve for a term as chairman established by rules of the board. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All members of the board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred by them in carrying out their duties as members of the board.

In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the board appointed by the Governor, the remaining members of the board shall appoint a judge of the probate court who is a member of the fund to fill such vacancy for the unexpired term; provided, however, that with respect to a vacancy in the membership of the board provided for by paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the person appointed to fill such vacancy for the unexpired term shall be a retired judge of the probate court who is a member of the fund.

The Judges of the Probate Courts Group of the County Officers Association of Georgia shall be authorized to submit the names of nominees for each position on the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to this Code section. The Governor may consider the nominees made by said Judges of the Probate Courts Group in making such appointments, but it is specifically provided that all such appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to make any appointments from nominees made by said Judges of the Probate Courts Group.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1984, p. 932, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1105, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 932, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The positions of membership on the Board of Commissioners of the Judges of the Probate Courts Retirement Fund, except for the Governor and the Attorney General, existing on June 30, 1984, shall stand abolished on July 1, 1984.”

Ga. L. 1984, p. 932, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act [which amended this Code section] shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [March 28, 1984] or upon its otherwise becoming law for the administrative purpose of allowing the Governor to consider appointments pursuant to quoted revised Code Section 47-11-20 of Section 1 of this Act. This Act shall become effective for all purposes on July 1, 1984.”

47-11-21.
Creation of office of secretary-treasurer; credit for service rendered; retirement benefits; surety bonds; reports and accounting.

There is created the office of secretary-treasurer of the board. The secretary-treasurer shall be elected and appointed by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. His compensation and duties may be fixed by the board.

The board or the secretary-treasurer with the approval of the board may employ additional personnel to assist the board or secretary-treasurer in carrying out duties provided in this chapter. The compensation and duties of any such personnel shall be fixed by the board.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, in addition to such salary, the secretary-treasurer shall receive credit for a sum of:

Six hundred dollars per annum for time served after March 21, 1958, until July 1, 1979;

Seven hundred fifty dollars per annum for time served after July 1, 1979, through December 31, 1992; and

One thousand two hundred fifty dollars for time served in any calendar year after 1992 as dues in the retirement system.

(b.1)

The secretary-treasurer shall be paid retirement benefits upon retiring as secretary-treasurer as provided in Article 5 of this chapter for a judge of the probate court retiring with the highest benefit allowed by such article and shall be entitled to any retirement option allowed by such article.

The board shall have authority to require the secretary-treasurer to give a good and sufficient surety bond in an amount to be determined by the board. The bond shall be payable to the board and shall be conditioned upon the proper and faithful performance of the duties of the secretary-treasurer. The secretary-treasurer shall be required to make quarterly reports to the board, which reports shall show all receipts and disbursements in such form and in such manner as the board may require. He shall likewise be required quarterly to make a full account of all moneys or property coming into his hands at any time.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, §§ 2, 14; Ga. L. 1968, p. 548, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 419, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 754, § 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 595, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1988, p. 630, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 379, § 1.

47-11-22.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board is granted the following powers and duties:

To provide for the collection of all moneys provided in this chapter;

To pay the administrative expenses of the board;

To hear and decide all applications for retirement benefits under this chapter;

To make payment of all retirement benefits that may be determined to be due under the terms of this chapter;

To make all necessary rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, for its government and for the government of the employees of the board;

To determine and fix rules of eligibility of persons to receive retirement benefits;

To make refunds and repayments to persons who may be entitled to receive them; and

To keep all records of its meetings.

The board shall also have all powers necessary for the purpose of administering this chapter.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this subsection, the board of commissioners is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 5 of this chapter for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under this chapter. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board of commissioners shall determine.

Any provision of paragraph (1) of this subsection to the contrary notwithstanding, no benefit increase shall be awarded under this subsection greater than 1.5 percent in any six-month period.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, §§ 64, 66/SB 436; Ga. L. 2014, p. 179, § 2/HB 601.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” three times in paragraph (c)(1) and substituted “Code Section 47-11-71 receive” for “Code Section 47-11-71 receives” near the end of paragraph (c)(2).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (c)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “Any provision of paragraph (1) of this subsection to the contrary notwithstanding, no member who receives an annual cost-of-living benefit increase pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 47-11-71 shall receive a benefit increase under this subsection greater than 1 percent of the maximum monthly benefit then in effect; provided, however, that no such member shall receive any such increase unless the members not entitled to a benefit increase under subsection (e) of Code Section 47-11-71 receive a like amount plus an additional increase of 2 percent of the maximum benefit then in effect; provided, further, that no benefit increase shall be awarded under this subsection greater than 1.5 percent in any six-month period.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-11-23.
Control of funds; special account for deposit and payment; powers regarding investments; power to employ agents as investment advisers.

The board shall have control of all funds provided for in this chapter, and all funds shall be received and disbursed from a special account to the credit of the board. The expenses of administering this fund and the benefits provided for in this chapter shall be paid from such funds. The board shall have authority to expend the funds in accordance with this chapter.

The board shall have full power to invest and reinvest such funds, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and any money belonging to the fund.

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to contract with such agents for their services as investment advisers and counselors, making recommendations for investments and making investments if the board so authorizes.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 265, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1997, p. 966, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 9; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “advisers” for “advisors” in the middle of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-11-24.
Power of board to take, hold, and invest any gift, grant, or bequest.

The board may take, by gift, grant, or bequest, any money, real or personal property, or any other thing of value and may hold or invest it for the use and purposes of the fund in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 6.

47-11-25.
Duty of board to keep records.

The board shall keep permanent records of all persons who qualify to participate in the benefits of this chapter, an accurate record of all payments and disbursements, and a detailed record of all the acts and doings of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 5.

47-11-26.
Annual audit; power of state auditor to conduct audit when he or she sees fit or at request of the Governor.

The state auditor is authorized and directed to make an annual audit of the acts and doings of the board and to make a complete report of the same to the General Assembly in such detail as he or she may see fit.
The state auditor shall not be required to distribute copies of the report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which he or she deems to be most effective and efficient.
The state auditor shall also have the right to audit the affairs of the board and any of its employees at any time that he or she may see fit or at any time that he or she may be requested to do so by the board or by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 33/SB 49.